Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 4. Unlawful Acts.

Sec. 08.08.210.
Who may practice law.

A person may not engage in the practice of law in the state unless the person is licensed to practice law in the state and is an active member of the Alaska Bar. A member of the bar in good standing in another jurisdiction may appear in the courts of the state under the rules the supreme court may adopt.

The practice of law shall be defined in the Alaska Bar Rules.

This section and AS

08.08.230

do not apply to the practice of law for the legislature by a person employed by or under contract with the legislature until the results are released of the third Alaska Bar examination following that person’s employment.

Employees of the Department of Law, the Public Defender Agency, and the office of public advocacy whose activities would constitute the practice of law under this chapter and under Alaska Bar Rules are required to obtain a license to practice law in the state not later than 10 months following the commencement of employment.

History.

(§ 12 ch 196 SLA 1955; am § 9 ch 181 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 88 SLA 1996; am §§
16, 17 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For practice in state courts by attorneys from other jurisdictions, see Civil Rule 81, Alaska Rules of Court; for definition of “practice of law,” see Alaska Bar Rule 63.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (a) and (d), substituted “the state” for “Alaska”, and made related and stylistic changes.

Sec. 08.08.220.
Disciplinary proceedings and review. [Repealed, § 5 ch 94 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 08.08.230.
Unlawful practice a misdemeanor.

A person not an active member of the Alaska Bar and not licensed to practice law in the state who engages in the practice of law or holds out as entitled to engage in the practice of law as that term is defined in the Alaska Bar Rules, or an active member of the Alaska Bar who wilfully employs such a person knowing that the person is engaging in the practice of law or holding out as entitled to so engage, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

This section does not prohibit the use of paralegal personnel as defined by rules of the Alaska supreme court.

History.

(§ 13 ch 196 SLA 1955; am § 10 ch 181 SLA 1976; am § 11 ch 52 SLA 1981; am § 18 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

For related court rule, see Rule 63, Alaska Bar Rules.

Cross references. —

For sentences for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

. For non-lawyer assistants, see Alaska Rule of Professional Conduct 5.3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in (a), substituted “licensed to practice law in the state” for “licensed to practice law in Alaska”.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The activity of presenting cases at an administrative hearing before the Human Rights Commission or one of its hearing officers by a non-attorney staff member of the commission does not constitute the unlawful practice of law. September 11, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 08.08.240.
Suspension upon conviction of certain crime. [Repealed, § 11 ch 181 SLA 1976.]